Washington statutes.
RCW 26.09.231

Residential time summary report.

The parties to dissolution matters shall file with the clerk of the court the residential time summary report. The summary report shall be on the form developed by the administrative office of the courts in consultation with the department of social and health services division of child support. The parties must complete the form and file the form with the court order.

[ 2017 c 183 s 2; 2007 c 496 s 701.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—2007 c 496: See note following RCW 26.09.002.